North Dakota, session 69, HB1581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE - TRIBAL TOURISM GRANTS -
ONE-TIME FUNDING - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $100,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of commerce for the purpose of providing
tribal tourism grants, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. A tribal
government in the state may apply to the department of commerce for a grant of up to $20,000 to
match funds committed by a tribal government to promote and enhance tribal nation tourism
opportunities. A grant application must include a plan for using funds to promote and enhance tribal
nation tourism opportunities to be overseen by the department of commerce division of tourism. The
department of commerce shall report to legislative management regarding the distribution, use, and
impact of grants. The appropriation provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.

H. B. NO. 1581 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1581.
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 9 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 40 Nays 6 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State